Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 4 Shooting Preserves

27-3-110.
Shooting preserve license required; effective dates; contents of application; conditions for issuance.

It shall be unlawful for any person to release pen raised game birds, except as provided in Code Section 27-2-14, unless the person has first obtained a commercial or private shooting preserve license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. Such license shall be effective from April 1 through March 31 of the following year.

An application for a shooting preserve license shall be submitted on a form furnished by the department and shall contain the following:

The applicant’s name and address;

A detailed description of the proposed activities and operations on the shooting preserve;

The location and description of the premises of the preserve; and

Such other information as may be necessary in order for the department to evaluate the application properly.

No shooting preserve license shall be issued unless the following conditions are met:

The land to comprise the preserve must consist of not more than 1,000 acres and not less than 100 contiguous acres and must be owned or leased by the applicant. If the land is under lease to the applicant, the lease shall be for a term of not less than one year from the date of application, and such lease shall be subject to inspection and approval by the department;

The boundary lines of the premises must be marked by signs indicating that they are the boundary line signs and that the premises are posted as against trespassing; and

As a condition of holding a shooting preserve license issued pursuant to this Code section, the owner of the shooting preserve, or his or her lessee or agent, shall, prior to allowing any person to hunt on such shooting preserve:

Confirm that such person has either completed a hunter education course as prescribed in Code Section 27-2-5; or

Provide such person with hunter education instruction that, at minimum, demonstrates techniques for proper firearm handling, unloading, and safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 295, §§ 3, 4, 9; Code 1933, § 45-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 386, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 807, § 3; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 27/SB 103; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.

27-3-111.
Removal of pen raised game bird; release of mallards or black ducks; failure to maintain or furnish records; failure to notify department of diseases.

It shall be unlawful to remove any pen raised game bird from a shooting preserve unless accompanied by the contact information of the preserve from which it was taken.

It shall be unlawful to release on a shooting preserve any mallard or black duck unless such duck is a pen raised mallard or black duck.

It shall be unlawful for a licensee under this article to fail to maintain a complete record of all pen raised game birds propagated, released, or taken on the preserve or to fail to allow the department access to such records during all regular business hours.

It shall be unlawful for any such licensee to fail to notify the department within 24 hours of the diagnosis of any epizootic disease of any pen raised game bird on the preserve, including unreleased stock.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.

27-3-112.
Legal hunting dates and hours; bag limits.

It shall be unlawful to hunt pen raised game birds, other than ring-necked pheasants, on a shooting preserve except between October 1 and March 31 of the following year, and except from one-half hour before sunrise to sunset.

It shall be unlawful to exceed the daily or season bag limits prescribed by law or regulation for any game bird or game animal, provided that there shall be no bag limits for pen raised game birds.

It shall be unlawful to hunt on a shooting preserve any game bird or game animal except during the open season for such game bird or game animal as prescribed by law or regulation; provided, however, that it shall be lawful to hunt bobwhite quail between October 1 and March 31 of the following year; provided, further, that it shall be lawful to hunt any other pen raised game bird between October 1 and March 31 of the following year when prior approval has been obtained from the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 807, § 4; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.

27-3-113.
Propagation, possession, or release of wildlife or wild animals on shooting preserves; importation of wildlife or wild animals for propagation, possession, or release.

It shall be unlawful for any person to propagate, possess, or release on any shooting preserve any wildlife or wild animal except pen raised game birds unless the person has received prior written approval from the department. Importation of any wildlife or wild animal for purposes of propagation, possession, or release on a shooting preserve shall be in conformance with the requirements of Article 3 of this chapter regarding transportation of wildlife, the requirements of Code Section 27-2-11 regarding game species, and the requirements of Chapter 5 of this title regarding wild animals.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 52; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.

27-3-114.
Laws and regulations applicable to shooting preserves; requirements as to hunting licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, all wildlife laws and regulations shall be in full force and effect on shooting preserves licensed pursuant to this article. Specifically, hunting licenses shall be required of all persons hunting on such preserves; provided, however, that it shall be lawful for any resident or nonresident to hunt pen raised game birds or fish in any private or state waters within the boundaries of such a preserve with a shooting preserve hunting license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23.

The requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 27-2-5 shall not apply to any person hunting pen raised game birds on a properly licensed shooting preserve, provided such person has received hunter education instruction that, at minimum, demonstrates techniques for proper firearm handling, unloading, and safety.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, § 13; Ga. L. 1990, p. 386, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 807, § 5; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 9/HB 326; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.

27-3-115.
Department authorized to contract with shooting preserves for issuance and sale of shooting preserve hunting licenses; requirements; nondisclosure of records.

The department is authorized to make and enter into agreements with properly licensed shooting preserves for the purpose of issuance and sale of shooting preserve hunting licenses.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 27-2-5, a shooting preserve authorized by the department pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may sell shooting preserve hunting licenses so long as such shooting preserve meets the requirements of subsection (c) of Code Section 27-3-110. The department may authorize a shooting preserve to issue temporary paper copies of shooting preserve hunting licenses to be used on such shooting preserve for one hunting season. Such paper copy shall satisfy the requirements of Code Section 27-2-1.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall not disclose any shooting preserve hunting license record which was lawfully purchased from a properly licensed shooting preserve and which reveals the name, home address, home telephone number, or social security number of the license holder unless written consent from the owner or lessee of such shooting preserve is obtained.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 1/HB 155.